Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 4. General Provisions

§ 201.
Occupational policy.

It is the policy of the State of Vermont that in their employment all persons shall be provided by their employers with safe and healthful working conditions at their work place, and that insofar as practicable an employee shall not experience diminished health, functional capacity, or life expectancy as a result of his or her work experience.

It is also the policy of the State that practices and procedures prescribed by an employer for performance of work or duties by his or her employees shall not be insofar as practicable, dangerous to the life, body, or well being of the employees.

It is the legislative intent that:

The provisions of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, as enacted by the Congress of the United States of America, which may be administered by a State agency, shall be administered and enforced in this State, by the State.

To effectuate the policy of the State, standards promulgated under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, enacted by Congress, and as amended at any time, when applicable to employment in the State of Vermont, shall be prescribed in rules made under this subchapter.

The State of Vermont shall cooperate with the appropriate federal agencies in carrying out the purposes of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 and the VOSHA Code of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 126.

§ 202.
General purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide efficient implementation of the policy of the State expressed in section 201 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 201 of this title.

§ 203.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Act” means the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, enacted by the Congress of the United States of America, and rules made thereunder, as amended at any time.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.

“Department” means the Department of Labor.

“Director” means the Director of Occupational Health.

“Division” means the Division of Occupational Health.

“Employee” means any person engaged in service to an employer for wages, salary or other compensation, excluding an independent contractor.

“Employer” means a person, as hereinafter defined, who employs one or more persons.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, partnership, trust, society, club, association, or other organization, including municipalities and the State and its instrumentalities.

“Place of employment” means any place where an employee is engaged in performance of his or her work or duties, or which is used in connection with an employee’s employment. It includes structures, buildings, machinery, equipment, tools, appliances, and materials used in connection with the employment. It also includes land and premises where an employer is carrying on any activity or business involving the use of one or more employees.

“Premises” means land and the structures thereon which contains a place of employment as herein defined.

“Rule” means a rule or regulation.

“VOSHA Code” means subchapters 4 and 5 of this chapter and 18 V.S.A. chapter 28, and the rules adopted thereunder.

“Review Board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Review Board.

“Secretary of Labor” means the Secretary of Labor of the United States of America.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 204.
Rules and procedure.

3 V.S.A. chapter 25, relating to administrative procedure, shall apply to this chapter and the VOSHA Code.

All or part of a printed publication of standards or rules, including standards promulgated under the Act, may be made a rule or part of a rule under this chapter or the VOSHA Code, by reference in the rule to the printed publication by its title and where it may be procured at the time the rule is promulgated under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 205.
Variances.

In cases involving a work place, the Secretary of Human Services, in the case of health standards, and the Commissioner, in the case of safety standards, may grant a variance from a standard or any provision thereof promulgated in a rule, under the same terms, conditions, and criteria as the federal Secretary of Labor may under sections 6(b)(6) and (d) of the Act.

The Secretary of Human Services, in the case of health standards, and the Commissioner, in the case of safety standards, may grant a variance, tolerance, or exemption to and from any or all provisions of the VOSHA Code as found necessary and proper to avoid serious impairment of the national defense. Such action shall not be taken without the written consent of a federal official authorized to make such variation, tolerance or exemption to and from any or all provisions of the Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 206.
Inspections and investigations.

The Commissioner or the Director, or their agents, may enter upon a premise, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the occupant, at reasonable times, for the purpose of inspecting the premises within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, to determine whether the provisions of the VOSHA Code and this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder are being observed. If entry is refused, the Commissioner or the Director may apply to a Superior judge for an order to enforce the rights given to the Commissioner and the Director and their agents under this section.

In making inspections and investigations, the Commissioner or the Director, as the case may be, may require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence under oath. Witnesses shall be paid the same fees and mileage as are paid witnesses in the Superior courts in criminal cases. In case of a contumacy, failure, or refusal of any person to obey such an order, any Superior Court within the jurisdiction of which the person is found or resides or transacts business, upon the application by the Commissioner, shall have jurisdiction to issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear to produce evidence if, as, and when so ordered, and to give testimony relating to the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

No person shall give advance notice of any inspection under the VOSHA Code, without prior authority of the Commissioner or the Director, which shall be in writing.

Under the VOSHA Code, the Secretary of Human Services and the Commissioner shall adopt rules regarding inspections and investigations to conform with the provisions and requirements of the Act.

Subject to regulations issued by the Commissioner or Secretary, a representative of the employer and a representative authorized by his or her employees shall be given an opportunity to accompany the Commissioner or Secretary or his or her authorized agent during the physical inspection of any workplace under subsection (a) of this section for the purpose of aiding such inspection. Where there is no authorized employee representative, the Commissioner or Secretary or his or her authorized agent shall consult with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of safety and health in the workplace.

Any employees or representative of employees who believes that a violation of a safety or health standard exists that threatens physical harm, or that an imminent danger exists, may request an inspection by giving notice to the Commissioner or Secretary or his or her authorized agent of the violation or danger. The notice shall be reduced to writing, shall set forth with reasonable particularity the grounds for the notice, and shall be signed by the employees or representative of employees. A copy of the notice shall be provided the employer or his or her agent no later than at the time of inspection, except that, upon the request of the person giving such notice, his or her name and the names of individual employees referred to therein shall not appear in the copy or on any record published, released, or made available by the Commissioner or Secretary. If upon receipt of the notification the Commissioner or Secretary determines there are reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or danger exists, he or she shall make a special inspection in accordance with the provisions of this section as soon as practicable to determine if a violation or danger exists. If the Commissioner or Secretary determines there are no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or danger exists, he or she shall notify the employees or representative of the employees in writing of such determination.

Prior to or during any inspection of a workplace, any employees or representative of employees employed in such workplace may notify the Commissioner or Secretary or any agent of the Commissioner or Secretary responsible for conducting the inspection, in writing, of any violation of this Code which they have reason to believe exists in such workplace. The Commissioner shall, by regulation, establish procedures for informal review of any refusal by a representative of the Commissioner to issue a citation with respect to any such alleged violation and shall furnish the employees or representative of employees requesting such review a written statement of the reasons for the Commissioner’s final disposition of the case.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 207.
Trade secrets.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the Commissioner or the Director, or their agents, in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this chapter or the VOSHA Code, which contains or might reveal a trade secret referred to in 18 U.S.C. § 1905 shall be considered confidential, except that such information may be disclosed to other officers or employees concerned in carrying out the provisions of this chapter or the VOSHA Code.
In any proceeding, the Commissioner, Director, Board, or court shall issue such orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 208.
Imminent danger.

Whenever the Commissioner finds that any workplace is in violation of any portion of the VOSHA Code or this chapter and that the violation creates a dangerous condition that can be reasonably expected to cause imminent death or serious physical harm, the Commissioner may order the workplace or any portion of the workplace to be immediately closed or order that steps be taken to avoid, correct, or remove the imminently dangerous conditions. The Commissioner may permit the presence of individuals necessary to avoid, correct, or remove the imminent danger, or to maintain the capacity of a continuous process operation to resume normal operations without complete cessation of operations, or where a cessation of operations is necessary, to permit it to be accomplished in a safe and orderly manner. On two business days’ notice to the Commissioner, an order issued under this section may be contested by filing a petition in Superior Court requesting dissolution or modification of the order. In that event, the court shall proceed to hear and to make an expeditious determination.

In the event the court vacates or otherwise invalidates the Commissioner’s order based upon a finding of willful misconduct or gross negligence, the court may determine the amount of damages suffered by the employer on account of the issuance of the order and shall enter judgment in that amount for the employer.

Any employer who violates an order of the Commissioner issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 per day.

Notice of orders issued under this section shall be served by certified mail with return receipt requested or in person to all parties who have a recorded interest in the property where land records for the property are recorded, including owners, tenants, mortgagees, attaching creditors, lien holders, and public utilities or water companies serving the premises.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1985, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 11

, § 50.

§ 209.
Appeals.

Except as to matters provided for in subchapter 5 of this chapter, a person aggrieved by an order or action of the Commissioner under this chapter, or a rule thereunder, may appeal to the Superior Court for the order or action within 20 days after the order is issued or the action is taken.
In the Superior Court, the matter will be heard de novo.
Appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court from the Superior Court.
The Superior Court for the county within which the appellant resides or has a place of business shall have jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 210.
Penalties.

Upon issuance of a citation under this chapter, the Review Board is authorized to assess civil penalties for grounds provided in this subsection. In assessing civil penalties, the Review Board shall follow to the degree practicable the federal procedures prescribed in rules adopted under the Act. The Review Board shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the business or operation of the employer being assessed, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the employer, and the history of previous violations. Civil penalties shall be paid to the Commissioner for deposit with the State Treasurer, and may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the State of Vermont brought in any court of competent jurisdiction. The Commissioner shall not reduce the assessed penalties in any fiscal year by more than 50 percent.

Any employer that willfully or repeatedly violates the requirements of this Code or any standard or rule adopted, or order issued pursuant to this Code may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $126,749.00 for each violation, but not less than $5,000.00 for each willful violation.

Any employer that has received a citation for a serious violation of the requirements of this Code, or any standard or rule adopted, or order issued pursuant to this Code, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to $12,675.00 for each violation.

Any employer that has received a citation for a violation of the requirements of this Code, or any standard or rule adopted, or order issued pursuant to this Code, if the violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious nature, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to $12,675.00 for each such violation.

Any employer that fails to correct a violation for which a citation has been issued within the period permitted for its correction, which period shall not begin to run until the date of the final order of the Review Board, in the case of any review proceeding under section 226 of this title initiated by the employer in good faith and not solely for delay or avoidance of penalties, may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $12,675.00 for each day during which the failure or violation continues.

Any employer that willfully violates any standard or rule adopted, or order issued pursuant to this Code, and that violation caused death to any employee, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than $126,749.00 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

Any person who gives advance notice of any inspection to be conducted under this Code, without authority from the Commissioner or Director or designees, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than $ 1,000.00 or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this Code shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

Any employer that violates any of the posting requirements, as prescribed under the provisions of this Code, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to $12,675.00 for each violation.

As provided under the federal Civil Penalties Inflation Adjustment Act Improvements Act of 2015 and the Act, the penalties provided in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (8) of this subsection (a) shall annually, on January 1, be adjusted to reflect the increase in the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. City Average, not seasonally adjusted, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous December 1.
(9) (A) As provided under the federal Civil Penalties Inflation Adjustment Act Improvements Act of 2015 and the Act, the penalties provided in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (8) of this subsection (a) shall annually, on January 1, be adjusted to reflect the increase in the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. City Average, not seasonally adjusted, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous December 1.

The Commissioner shall calculate and publish the adjustment to the penalties on or before January 1 of each year, and the penalties shall apply to fines imposed on or after that date.

For purposes of this section, a serious violation shall be deemed to exist in a place of employment if there is a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm could result from a condition that exists, or from one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes that have been adopted or are in use, in such place of employment unless the employer did not and could not, with the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1985, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 23

, § 1, eff. May 3, 1991;

2003, No. 66

, § 74;

2017, No. 69

, § D.1, eff. June 8, 2017.